test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-mieqlkhkh_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - mieʹlǩǩ â-stem: # Noun 'milk/maito' - full paradigm
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom: mieʹlǩǩ
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen: mieʹlǩ
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc: mieʹlǩ
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill: meâlkka
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc: mieʹlǩest
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Com: mieʹlǩin
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Ess: mieʹlǩǩen
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Par: mieʹlǩǩed
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe: [mieʹlǩtaa, mieʹlǩtää]
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom: mieʹlǩ
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen: mieʹlǩi
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc: mieʹlǩid
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill: mieʹlǩid
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc: mieʹlǩin
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Com: mieʹlǩivuiʹm
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe: [mieʹlǩitaa, mieʹlǩitää]
